Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Chapter 11. Municipal Elections
[Repealed]

For provisions of the Mississippi Election Code, which became effective January 1, 1987, see §§23-15-1 et seq.

§§ 21-11-1 through 21-11-23.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 329, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§21-11-1. [Codes, 1892, § 3028; 1906, § 3433; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5993; 1930, § 2595; 1942, § 3374-60; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 60; Laws, 1984, ch. 457, § 2]

§21-11-3. [Codes, 1892, § 3029; 1906, § 3434; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5994; 1930, § 2596; 1942, § 3374-61; Laws, 1904, ch. 158; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 61; Laws, 1984, ch. 457, § 3]

§21-11-5. [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6043; 1930, § 2631; 1942, § 3374-63; Laws, 1912, ch. 120; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 63]

§21-11-7. [Codes, 1930, § 2597; 1942, § 3374-62; Laws, 1922, ch. 219; Laws, 1928, ch. 184; Laws, 1932, ch. 226; Laws, 1936, ch. 281; Laws, 1950, ch. 491 § 62; Laws, 1976, ch. 485, § 11]

§21-11-8. [En Laws, 1976, ch. 485, § 12]

§21-11-9. [Codes, 1892, § 3031; 1906, § 3436; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5996; 1930, § 2598; 1942, § 3374-64; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 64; Laws, 1971, ch. 494, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 457, § 329]

§21-11-11. [Codes, 1942, § 3374-108; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 108; Laws, 1984, ch. 457, § 329]

§21-11-13. [Codes, 1892, § 3032; 1906, § 3437; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5997; 1930, § 2599; 1942, § 3374-65; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 65; Laws, 1984, ch. 457, § 329]

§21-11-15. [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6044; 1930, § 2632; 1942, § 3374-66; Laws, 1912, ch. 120; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 66; Laws, 1984, ch. 457, § 329]

§21-11-17. [Codes, 1892, § 3033; 1906, § 3438; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5998; 1930, § 2600; 1942, § 3374-67; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 67; Laws, 1984, ch. 457, § 329]

§21-11-19. [Codes, 1942, § 3374-69.5; Laws, 1948, ch. 314; Laws, 1984, ch. 457, § 329]

§21-11-21. [Codes, 1942, § 3374-69.7; Laws, 1958, ch. 516; Laws, 1984, ch. 457, § 329]

§21-11-23. [Codes, 1942, §§ 3374-68, 3374-111; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, §§ 68, 111; Laws, 1952, ch. 375; Laws, 1984, ch. 457, § 329]